District of Columbia statutes.
49-106

Rules for parades and encampments.

Every commanding officer, when on duty, may ascertain and fix necessary bounds and limits to his parade or encampment. Whoever intrudes within the limits of the parade or encampment after being forbidden, or whoever shall interrupt, molest, or obstruct any officer or soldier while on duty, may be put and kept under guard until the parade, encampment, or duty be concluded; and the commanding officer may turn over such person to any police officer, and said police officer is required to detain him in custody for examination or trial before the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, and the judge thereof may punish such offense by a fine not exceeding $25.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 779, ch. 328, § 48
renumbered Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 634, ch. 146, § 51
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
1981 Ed., § 39-606.
1973 Ed., § 39-606.